District of Columbia statutes.
1-333.06

Appropriations for printing schedules or lists of supplies and materials.

No part of any appropriation for the District of Columbia, except for public schools, shall be expended for printing or binding a schedule or list of supplies and materials for the furnishing of which contracts have been or may be awarded.

History

June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 13

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-335.
1973 Ed., § 1-242.